Utah statutes.
10-5-124.   Warrants tendered for claims.
If the town is without funds on deposit in one of its appropriate bank
accounts with which to pay any lawfully approved claim, the town clerk may
draw and sign a warrant on the treasurer of the town for payment of the claim,
the warrant to be tendered to the payee named thereon.
